Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-616
Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with the Nebraska Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time a decision is made or action is taken, and not by hindsight.

Laws 2007, LB136, § 7.